Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1507
Boards; officers; quorum required to perform duties.

Each board shall annually elect from among its members a chairperson and a vice-chairperson, each to serve for one year. The board shall appoint a secretary and a treasurer, and one person may hold both such offices. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and no action shall be taken by less than a majority of the members present and voting, except that approval of employee contracts and the appropriation of money from the funds of the community college area shall be by the affirmative vote of a majority of elected members of the board. For purposes of this section, appropriation shall mean the adoption or modification of budgets for the community college area.

Laws 1975, LB 344, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2641;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 29;

Laws 1995, LB 372, § 1.

Chapter 79, article 26, the Technical Community College Area Act, is not in violation of Article VIII, section 1A, of the Constitution. State ex rel. Western Technical Com. Col. Area v. Tallon, 196 Neb. 603, 244 N.W.2d 183 (1976).